North Dakota, session 69, HB1182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION - ROAD
PROJECT GRANT - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND - ONE-TIME
FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the strategic investment and
improvements fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $611,000, or so
much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of transportation for the purpose of
providing a road project grant to Dickey county for replacing a culvert system and raising the
grade of a road to address flooding on the road, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and
ending June 30, 2027. The funding provided in this section is considered a one-time funding
item.
Page No. 1 25.0726.01000